Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 462.
SECTION 2. No person may wager money or any other thing of value  on the outcome
of a greyhound race or  other dog race, or accept or facilitate such wagering, regardless of
the location at which the race takes place.
SECTION 3.  ORS 462.725 is amended to read:
462.725. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Oregon Racing Commission
may adopt rules to:
(a) License  and regulate all phases of operation of Multi-Jurisdictional Simulcasting and Inter-
active Wagering Totalizator Hubs located in Oregon; and
(b) Authorize and license  Multi-Jurisdictional Simulcasting and Interactive Wagering Totalizator
Hubs to conduct  simulcast broadcasting of, and mutuel wagering on, animal races, including previ-
ously held races on which mutuel wagering is lawful in Oregon.
(2) In addition to  the other rules of operation adopted by the commission, the commission shall
adopt a rule setting the amount that may be taken from the gross  receipts of the multi-jurisdictional
mutuel system.
(3) All  employees working in Oregon and all officers of any Multi-Jurisdictional Simulcasting
and Interactive Wagering Totalizator Hubs located  and operating in Oregon must obtain a license
from the commission prior to the commencement of business or employment. The  commission shall
adopt rules establishing license fees for the employees and officers, not to exceed $30 per year.
(4) Payments to be made to the commission include:
(a) Multi-Jurisdictional Simulcasting and Interactive Wagering Totalizator Hub license  fee not
more than $200 per operating day.
(b) Not more than one percent of  total gross receipts of mutuel wagering recorded by the
totalizator system.
(5) Of the moneys received by the commission  under subsection (4)(b) of this section, 25 percent
shall be paid to  the State Treasurer for deposit in the General Fund and 75 percent shall be retained
by the commission. The commission may adopt rules under which the  moneys retained by the com-
mission may be distributed for the benefit of the Oregon pari-mutuel racing industry.
Enrolled House Bill 3020 (HB 3020-A) Page 1
(6) Wagers on  previously held races authorized under subsection (1) of this section are subject
to the provisions of ORS 462.157.
[(7) A Multi-Jurisdictional Simulcasting and Interactive Wagering Totalizator  Hub licensee may
establish an account for wagering on greyhound  racing for an individual unless wagering on live
greyhound racing is unlawful in the jurisdiction of the individual’s principal residence. ]
(7) A Multi-Jurisdictional Simulcasting and Interactive  Wagering Totalizator Hub
licensee may not accept  or facilitate mutuel wagers on greyhound racing or other dog racing,
regardless of the location at which the race takes place.
SECTION 4.  ORS 462.010 is amended to read:
462.010. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Breaks” means the odd cents remaining after the payoff prices have been computed in ac-
cordance with ORS 462.140 (3).
(2) “Calendar year” means a 12-month year, January 1 through December 31.
(3) “Commission” means the Oregon Racing Commission.
(4) “Continuous race meet” includes any exhibition of animal racing  continuously at the same
race course by two or more licensees where the mutuel  system is used in conjunction with any race.
(5) “Drug” means any narcotic, sedative, anesthetic, analgesic, drug or other medication of  any
kind or description intended for use in any manner, directly or indirectly, internally or externally,
in the diagnosis, treatment, mitigation or cure of injury or disease  or for use in the prevention of
disease that could affect, in any manner,  the racing condition or performance of an animal as a
depressant, stimulant, local anesthetic, analgesic, sedative or otherwise. “Drug” includes:
(a) Substances, other than foods, intended to affect the  structure or any function of the body
of the animal and all  substances affecting the central nervous system, respiratory system or blood
pressure of any animal other than vitamins or supplemental feeds; and
(b) Any identified substance that can affect or interfere with the true and  accurate testing and
analysis of blood, saliva, urine or other samples taken from racing animals.
(6) “Fiscal year” means a 12-month year, as described in ORS 293.605.
(7) “Gross mutuel wagering” means all mutuel wagering that is made in person:
(a) At the race course of a race meet licensee;
(b) At an off-race course mutuel wagering location approved by the commission; or
(c) Through account wagering authorized under ORS 462.142.
(8) “Licensee” means  a person, partnership, corporation, political subdivision, municipal corpo-
ration or any other body holding a license under this chapter.
(9) “Mutuel” means a system whereby:
(a) Wagers with respect to the outcome of a race are placed  with a wagering pool in which the
participants are not wagering against the operator; and
(b) The operator distributes to one or more winning participants the total amount  in the
wagering pool, less amounts deducted by the operator as approved by the commission.
(10) “Public training track” means any race course  or other facility that is available or open to
the public for use in the training or schooling of racing animals.
(11) “Race” means any race conducted  in a race meet. “Race” includes races conducted without
wagering, provided one or more races in the meet are conducted with wagering.
(12) “Race course” means  all the premises used in connection with the conduct of a race meet,
including but not limited to, the race track, grandstands, paddock, stables[ , kennels ] and all  other
buildings and grounds adjacent to or appurtenant to the physical limits of the race track.
(13) “Race meet” means any  exhibition of animal racing where the mutuel system is used in
conjunction with any race.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 462.020 is amended to read:
462.020. (1) A person may not hold a race meet without having first obtained  and having in full
force and effect a license therefor issued by the Oregon Racing Commission.
(2) A trainer,  driver, jockey, apprentice jockey, horse owner, [ dog owner, ] exercise person, agent,
authorized agent, jockey’s agent, stable foreman, groom, valet, veterinarian, horseshoer, steward,
Enrolled House Bill 3020 (HB 3020-A) Page 2
stable guard, starter, timer, judge or other person acting as a participant or official at any  race
meet, including all employees of the pari-mutuel department, may not participate in race  meets
without having first obtained and having  in full force and effect a license issued by the commission,
pursuant to such rules as the commission shall make. The  commission by rule may require other
employees of a race meet licensee who  are engaged in or performing duties at the race course to
obtain a license issued by the commission prior to engaging  or performing such duties. The com-
mission by rule may also  require persons, including corporations, who are not employees of a race
meet licensee, but who are authorized to do business  at the race course, to obtain a license issued
by the commission prior to conducting such business.
(3) A person may not operate a public training track [ or public kennel for greyhounds partic-
ipating in a race meet ] without having first obtained and  having in full force and effect a license
issued by the commission.
(4) The commission may require  each applicant for a license to be photographed and shall re-
quire each applicant to be fingerprinted as part of the  licensing procedure for the purpose of re-
questing a state or nationwide criminal records check under ORS 181A.195.
(5) Each person holding a license under this chapter shall comply with all  rules and orders of
the commission.
(6) Notwithstanding the  requirements of subsection (2) of this section, the commission, upon re-
ceipt of a written application for a license on forms provided by the commission, may in its sound
discretion issue a temporary license valid for a period not to  exceed 10 days pending final approval
or disapproval of the written application for a license.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 462.030 is amended to read:
462.030. No person is eligible to operate a race meet with a  license issued under this chapter
unless the person is the  owner or controls the possession of a properly constructed race track
suitable for the [ class of ] races which are proposed  to be conducted at such race track and improved
with safe and suitable grandstands, equipped  with reasonably sanitary accommodations, adequate
stables for livestock together with adequate  fire protection equipment, and such other proper im-
provements as  in the judgment of the Oregon Racing Commission may be required, taking into
consideration the location of such race track and the probable capacity requirements to accommo-
date the crowd and the number of people that will reasonably be expected to occupy the grandstands
and attend the race meets.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 462.040 is amended to read:
462.040. (1) Race meet licenses granted by the Oregon Racing Commission shall be limited to[ :]
[(a)] licenses for horse and mule race meets [ (Class A) ].
[(b) Licenses for greyhound race meets (Class B). ]
[(2)(a) Except as the commission otherwise may provide by rule, no  licensee shall be granted li-
censes of both classes nor shall licenses be issued for more than one class  of racing on the same race
course, track or location. ]
[(b) In adopting rules to carry  out the provisions of this subsection, the commission shall consider,
among other  matters, the impact on existing race meet licensees in the county in which application for
a license referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsection is made. ]
[(3) The commission may not grant any license for greyhound race meets after July 1, 2022. ]
[(4)] (2)  The license shall specify  the number of days the race meet shall continue and the
number of races per day.
SECTION 8.  ORS 462.057 is amended to read:
462.057. (1)  A race meet licensee designated in subsection (2) of this section shall make pay-
ments as follows:
(a) License fee - $25 per fiscal year payable to the Oregon Racing Commission.
[(b) A percentage of gross mutuel wagering shall be paid to the commission as follows: ]
[(A) If the race meet is for horses or mules - one percent. ]
[(B) If the race meet is for greyhounds - 1.6 percent. ]
(b) One percent of gross mutual wagering payable to the commission.
Enrolled House Bill 3020 (HB 3020-A) Page 3
(c) If [ the race meet is for horses or mules and ] the average  daily gross mutuel wagering during
the preceding fiscal year exceeded $150,000, a percentage  of the gross mutuel wagering shall be paid
as follows:
(A) To purses - such amount, subject  to prior approval by the commission, as the race meet
licensee and the horse owners, or mule owners if the race is for  mules, may agree upon, plus an
additional 0.1 percent. The additional 0.1 percent shall not  become part of the regular purse account
but shall be used only to supplement purses  of races consisting exclusively of Oregon bred horses
or mules;
(B) To the Oregon  Thoroughbred Owners and Breeders Association, Incorporated, purse sup-
plements for owners of Oregon bred thoroughbred horses - one  percent of gross mutuel wagering
on thoroughbred horse races, to  be apportioned among the owners in the same ratio that each
owner’s purses for Oregon bred thoroughbred horses for the race meet  bears to the total purses for
Oregon bred thoroughbred horses for the race meet;
(C) To the Oregon Quarter Horse Racing Association, Incorporated,  purse supplements for
owners of Oregon  bred quarter horses - one percent of gross mutuel wagering on quarter horse
races, to be apportioned among the owners in the same ratio that each owner’s purses for Oregon
bred quarter horses for the race meet bears to the total  purses for Oregon bred quarter horses for
the race meet;
(D) To each association of horse or mule owners, trainers or  breeders recognized by the com-
mission as representing the other breeds of horses or  mules not designated in subparagraphs (B) and
(C) of this paragraph, purse supplements for owners of other Oregon bred horses or mules, not  des-
ignated in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of this paragraph, one percent of gross mutuel wagering  for
races of other horses or mules, to be apportioned  among the owners in the same ratio that each
owner’s purses for other Oregon bred horses or mules for  the race meet bears to the total purses
for other Oregon bred horses or mules for the race meet;
(E) Subject to prior approval  of the commission, each horse or mule owners, trainers or breeders
association designated in subparagraphs (B), (C) and (D) of this paragraph may use a  portion of the
purse supplements as operating expenses only for receipt,  handling and payment of these funds; and
(F) To a special track fund to  be used primarily for improving the race track facilities benefiting
the horse and mule owners, trainers or breeders in the barn area - 0.2 percent. All such funds  shall
be retained by the licensee  in a separate account from all other funds and no disbursements or
transfers shall be made therefrom without  prior approval of the commission. All physical improve-
ments paid from such funds shall satisfy reasonable fire, health,  quality and construction standards
established or approved by the commission. Unless the commission  provides otherwise, such im-
provements shall be made on the race course where the race meet which created the fund was held.
[(d) If the race meet  is for greyhounds, a percentage of the gross mutuel wagering shall be paid
as follows: ]
[(A) To a special fund to be  used primarily for the development and operation of a training track
and related facilities upon which to train greyhounds - 0.1 percent. All such funds shall be retained
by the licensee in a separate account from all other funds and no  disbursements or transfers shall be
made therefrom without prior approval of the commission. All physical  improvements paid from such
funds shall satisfy reasonable fire, health,  quality and construction standards established or approved
by the commission. Unless the commission provides otherwise, such improvements shall be made on  the
race course of the race meet licensee; and ]
[(B) To the Oregon Greyhound  Breeders Association, Incorporated, purse supplements for owners
of Oregon bred greyhounds - 0.5 percent of  gross mutuel wagering, to be apportioned among the own-
ers, in accordance with the rules of the commission and subject to approval  by the commission, in the
same ratio that each owner’s purses for  Oregon bred greyhounds for the race meet bears to the total
purses for Oregon bred greyhounds for the race meet. ]
(2) Licensees subject to the provisions of this section are:
(a) The Pendleton Roundup.
(b) The Eastern Oregon Livestock Fair.
Enrolled House Bill 3020 (HB 3020-A) Page 4
(c) The Pacific International Livestock Exposition.
(d) Any county fair.
(e) All other nonprofit,  fair-type associations which conducted a licensed race meet in calendar
year 1968 or 1969.
(f) The Pine Valley Fair Association.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 462.067 is amended to read:
462.067. All licensees of race meets except those subject  to ORS 462.057 and 462.062 shall make
payments as follows:
(1) License fee - $100 per racing day, payable to the Oregon Racing Commission.
(2) Percentage of gross mutuel wagering payable to the commission - 1.6 percent.
[(3) Percentage of gross mutuel wagering on greyhound  races payable to the Oregon Greyhound
Breeders Association, Incorporated - 0.5 percent for purse supplements for  owners of Oregon bred
greyhounds, to be apportioned among the owners, in accordance with the  rules of the commission and
subject to approval by the commission, in the same ratio that each owner’s purses for Oregon bred
greyhounds for the race meet bears  to the total purses for Oregon bred greyhounds for the race meet.
Subject to the prior written approval of the  commission, the Oregon Greyhound Breeders Association,
Incorporated, may use a  portion of the funds received pursuant to this section and ORS 462.057
(1)(d)(B) to offset expenses for receipt, accounting, handling and payment of those funds. ]
[(4) To a special fund to be used primarily for the development and operation of a  training track
and related facilities upon which to train greyhounds - 0.1 percent. All such funds shall be retained
by the licensee in a separate account from all other funds and no  disbursements or transfers shall be
made therefrom without prior approval of the commission. All physical  improvements paid from such
funds shall satisfy reasonable fire, health,  quality and construction standards established or approved
by the commission. Unless the commission provides otherwise, such improvements shall be made on  the
race course of the race meet licensee. ]
SECTION 10.
 ORS 462.070 is amended to read:
462.070. (1) The Oregon Racing  Commission may adopt rules establishing license fees for persons
described in ORS 462.020 (2), not to exceed $30 per year. Prior to adopting a rule  that establishes
a fee for  a license, the commission shall review the fees charged for similar licenses in other states.
The commission also may charge a reasonable  fee for claiming certificates in an amount not to ex-
ceed $10.
(2) The license fee per fiscal  year for operators of public training tracks [ or kennels ] required
to be licensed under ORS 462.020 (3) shall be:
(a) For the Oregon State Fair or a county or district fair, $10.
(b) For all other operators of public training tracks [ or kennels ], $25.
(3) The commission may by  rule provide for a license that is issued to a person described in ORS
462.020 (2) to be valid for one, two or three years from date of  issuance. The commission may fix
the expiration date of the license and may prorate the fee established for the license.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 462.075 is amended to read:
462.075. (1) The Oregon Racing Commission may refuse  to issue to or renew the license of any
applicant if it has reasonable ground to believe that the applicant:
(a) Has been suspended or ruled off a recognized course in another jurisdiction by the  racing
board or commission thereof.
(b) Is not of good repute and moral character.
(c) Does not have,  when previously licensed, a good record of compliance with the racing or
gaming laws of this state or of any other state and with the rules of the commission or of any other
racing or gaming commission.
(d) If the applicant  is a corporation, firm or association, is not duly authorized to conduct
business within the State of Oregon.
(e) If an individual, has been convicted of a crime involving  moral turpitude or of any gambling
or gambling-related offense, or, if a corporation,  firm or association, is in whole or in part controlled
Enrolled House Bill 3020 (HB 3020-A) Page 5
or operated directly or indirectly  by a person who has been convicted of a crime involving moral
turpitude or of any gambling or gambling-related offense.
(f) If an individual, is engaged in wagering by other than the mutuel method or in  pool selling
or bookmaking in any state of the United States or foreign country or, if a corporation, firm  or as-
sociation, is in whole or in part controlled or operated directly or indirectly  by a person who is
engaged in wagering by other than the mutuel method or in pool selling or bookmaking in any  state
of the United States or foreign country.
(g) Has been found guilty by the commission of a violation of this  chapter or any rules of the
commission.
(h) Should  not, in the best interest of the safety, welfare, health, peace and morals of the people
of the state, be granted a license.
(2) The commission may refuse  to issue or renew a license to conduct a race meet for any
ground set forth  in subsection (1) of this section or if it has reasonable ground to believe any of the
following to be true:
(a) That the applicant is not possessed of or has not demonstrated financial responsibility  suffi-
cient to meet adequately the requirements of the enterprise proposed to be licensed.
(b) That the applicant is not the true owner of  the enterprise proposed to be licensed, that other
persons have ownership in the enterprise which has not been disclosed or, if the applicant is a
corporation, that any of the stock of such corporation is subject to a contract or option to  purchase
at any time during the period for which the license is issued.
(c) That the granting of a  license in the locality set out in the application is not demanded by
public interest or convenience.
(d) That the applicant, if a corporation, transferred any of its stock  after an application for a
license to hold a race meet was filed with the commission without prior commission approval. The
provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to day-to-day transfers of stock of a publicly held cor-
poration whose shares are  publicly quoted and regularly traded in the marketplace unless the
transfer, or  a combination of transfers, involves a controlling interest in or affects the operational
control of the corporation, or involves 10 percent or more of any class of stock of the corporation.
(e) That the  applicant lacks, or if the applicant is a corporation, its officers, managerial em-
ployees, directors and principal stockholders lack, the requisite character,  reputation, general busi-
ness and managerial  competence and ability, and experience in the business of racing so as to justify
or command public confidence.
(f) That  the granting of the application would adversely and unreasonably affect the economy
of the State of Oregon and its people and the revenues of this state and of other beneficiaries  of
racing funds designated in this chapter.
(3) The commission may refuse to issue or renew a license to any person who has made a false
statement of a material fact to the commission.
(4) The commission may refuse to issue or renew a license to  any applicant for a race meet li-
cense if the applicant has failed to meet any monetary obligation in connection with  any race meet
held in this state.
[(5) The  commission may deny a license to any applicant for a race meet license under ORS 462.067
unless the applicant for the license and the greyhound kennel  owners, or their representative associ-
ation, have previously agreed upon a purse schedule. ]
[(6)] (5)  Before refusing to license any applicant  for a race meet license, the commission shall
afford the applicant an opportunity for hearing after reasonable notice  as provided in ORS chapter
183. When the commission refuses to license an applicant on the basis of grounds provided in sub-
section (1)(b), (c) or (h) of this section,  the commission shall specify the particular activities that
constitute the grounds for refusal and shall give the applicant written notice thereof.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 462.110 is amended to read:
462.110. (1) For the protection of  the public, and all members thereof, the exhibitors and visitors,
every race meet licensee shall carry public liability insurance written on an approved  form by a
Enrolled House Bill 3020 (HB 3020-A) Page 6
company licensed to do business in Oregon and in  an amount approved by the Oregon Racing
Commission.
(2) Every person licensed to conduct a race meet shall provide and deliver  to the commission
a bond signed by a surety company authorized to  do business in Oregon in such form as is required
by the commission and in an amount determined by  the commission. The bond shall be conditioned
that the licensee will pay  to the state all moneys due it under this chapter, including moneys which
escheat pursuant to ORS 462.073 and any fines imposed by any court or by  any state agency; to
horsemen [ or greyhound  owners ], all moneys owing and all moneys required to be paid for breakage,
purses and Oregon-bred purse supplements; to persons presenting valid winning tickets,  the amounts
owing to them; and to the special track fund or training track fund, all moneys required to be paid
to those funds by statute or rule. In  lieu of a surety bond the commission may accept a certificate
of deposit, an irrevocable letter of credit, or equivalent which will assure that  the obligations de-
scribed above are paid, up to the designated amount.
(3) The Attorney General or the district attorney of the county wherein the  race meet is held
shall prosecute all actions on such bonds on behalf of the state.
(4) Any person having a claim against the licensee for any obligation covered by the  bond or
bond substitute, except cause of action covered by public liability  insurance, may prosecute the
same in an action in behalf of the  claimant brought in the name of the state for the use and benefit
and at the expense of such claimant. The court may award reasonable attorney fees to the prevailing
party in an  action under this subsection. If the amount of the bond or bond substitute is insufficient
to cover all  obligations, amounts owing to and for the benefit of the state pursuant to ORS 462.073
(3) shall have priority over any other claims. No  action may be brought for recovery on the bond
or bond substitute unless  written notice of the claim is made to the commission and to the race meet
licensee  within  120 days after the last day of the race meet or continuous race meet in which the
obligation arose. The notice must be by registered mail, certified mail with return receipt or  per-
sonal service to the licensee or to the licensee’s registered  agent. Any action for recovery on the
bond or bond substitute must be brought no earlier than 60 days and no later than  180 days after
service of the written notice on the  race meet licensee or on the licensee’s registered agent. These
limitations shall not apply to claims for  valid winning tickets if the claimant has made a timely
claim pursuant to ORS 462.073 (2).
(5) Every person licensed  to conduct a race meet for horses shall carry insurance to protect
jockeys and, if appropriate, drivers. The type, form and  amount of insurance, and the carrier, must
be approved by the commission.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 462.125 is amended to read:
462.125. (1) The Oregon Racing Commission shall determine the number [ and classes ] of race
meets to be held in any fiscal year, and the total number of racing dates to be granted to a licensee
subject to provisions of ORS 462.062 and 462.067. Not  more than 350 days of racing, exclusive of
racing days authorized to designated licensees pursuant to  subsection (5) of this section, shall be
held in any metropolitan area in any  fiscal year. A licensee shall conduct at least 720 live races
under the license during each  fiscal year race meets are held under the license. The commission
may reduce the number of races required under this section upon application by  a horsemen’s as-
sociation that negotiates with the race meet licensee.
(2) If a licensee under ORS 462.062 or  462.067 fails, for good cause, to complete all of the allo-
cated days in a licensed race meet or if the commission does not receive and approve license  ap-
plications for all of the days allocated to [ either class of ] racing, the commission may add the unused
or unallocated days no later than June 30 of the following fiscal year,  to the racing days allocated
to and available to the licensee or, in  the discretion of the commission, to any other licensee [ of
either class of racing ] in  the metropolitan area. Additional race days allocated under this subsection
are exempt from the limit of 350 days of racing in a fiscal year imposed by subsection (1) of  this
section. The additional racing days granted by the commission to  any eligible licensee may not ex-
ceed the total of the unused or unallocated racing days in any one fiscal year.
Enrolled House Bill 3020 (HB 3020-A) Page 7
(3) If an emergency occurs on the day  of racing, and a night racing program runs past the hour
of midnight, such time after midnight is not considered an additional racing day.
(4) As used in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, “metropolitan area” means:
(a) Multnomah, Clackamas and Washington Counties.
(b) Marion and Polk Counties.
(c) Linn and Benton Counties.
(d) A county other than those designated in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(5) Each licensee designated in ORS  462.057 may be granted up to 12 days of horse[ ,] or  mule
[or greyhound ] racing to be held within the county in which the licensee holds its fair  or show or
at a race course owned by  a governmental agency or a nonprofit corporation in an adjoining county.
If a licensee does not  use all of the licensee’s allocated race days during the fiscal year, the com-
mission, in the commission’s discretion, may allow that licensee  to use the leftover days in the next
fiscal year. If a licensee referred to in this subsection wishes to make application to the commission
to schedule racing days that conflict with racing days previously scheduled by  another such
licensee, at least 30 days  prior to the date of a meeting of the commission, the governing bodies of
the applicant and the previous licensee shall meet  at a time and place prescribed by the previous
licensee to discuss the applicant’s proposed racing day schedule.  The conclusion of the parties re-
garding the proposals for conflicting racing days and the matters upon which the  parties agree or
disagree shall be reduced to writing signed by the parties and  submitted to the commission not later
than 14  days prior to a meeting of the commission. The commission may approve or disapprove
proposals for conflicting  racing days upon such terms and conditions as the commission considers
appropriate.
(6) The commission may not grant a license for any race meet within a county for  dates that
conflict with racing dates granted to the county fair of such county.
(7) The commission may not grant a licensee that  is subject to ORS 462.062 a license for a race
meet for a date that  conflicts with a race meet date granted to a licensee that is subject to ORS
462.057, unless the commission has the consent of the  licensee that is subject to ORS 462.057. This
subsection applies only if the licensee that  is subject to ORS 462.057 held a race meet during the
2002 calendar year on a date substantially similar to the  date that is the subject of the conflict. A
licensee that is  subject to ORS 462.057 may not unreasonably withhold consent under this sub-
section.
SECTION 14.
ORS 462.135 and 462.279 are repealed.
SECTION 15.  ORS 462.140 is amended to read:
462.140. (1) A person may not conduct or  commit, attempt or conspire to conduct or commit pool
selling, bookmaking, or circulate handbooks, or bet or wager on any licensed race  meet, other than
by the mutuel method.  All moneys wagered in Oregon must be accounted for through a computerized
mutuel wagering system in use by an operating  race meet in this state and approved by the Oregon
Racing Commission. Wagering into pools outside of Oregon via telephone or other device is prohib-
ited unless the wagering information is  transmitted by a licensee that conducts off-race course
mutuel wagering pursuant to ORS 462.700 to 462.740.
(2) A race meet licensee may not  take more than 22 percent of the gross receipts of any mutuel
wagering system subject to approval by the commission.
(3) A race meet licensee shall compute breaks in the mutuel system at 10 cents  for each dollar
wagered in a specific mutuel pool except, when the breaks  in the mutuel system compute to less
than 10 cents total for each dollar wagered, the race  meet licensee shall compute the breaks on that
specific mutuel pool at five cents. When the breaks in the mutuel system  compute at 10 cents or
more for each dollar  wagered, the race meet licensee shall pay in increments of 10 cents for each
dollar wagered. When the breaks in the mutuel system compute to less than 10  cents for each dollar
wagered, the race meet licensee shall pay five cents for each dollar wagered. For horses, 45 percent
of the breaks shall be  retained by the licensee. [ For greyhounds, 33-1/3 percent shall be retained by
the licensee. ] The other 55 percent [ for horses and 66-2/3 percent for greyhounds ] shall be paid  as
follows:
Enrolled House Bill 3020 (HB 3020-A) Page 8
(a) For thoroughbred horse races, to the Oregon Thoroughbred Owners and Breeders  Associ-
ation, Incorporated, to be used by  that association subject to prior approval of the commission, in
such amounts and for such of the following purposes as the association deems desirable:
(A) For breeders awards;
(B) For stallion awards;
(C) For education of the  members of the association and other horsemen regarding the breeding
and racing of thoroughbred horses; or
(D) For the promotion and development of thoroughbred horse breeding and racing in Oregon.
(b) For quarter horse races, to the Oregon  Quarter Horse Racing Association, Incorporated, to
be used by that association subject to prior approval of the commission, in such amounts and  for
such of the following purposes as the association deems desirable:
(A) For breeders awards;
(B) For stallion awards;
(C) For education of the  members of the association and other horsemen regarding the breeding
and racing of quarter horses; or
(D) For the promotion and development of quarter horse breeding and racing in Oregon.
(c) For races for any other horses not designated in paragraphs  (a) and (b) of this subsection,
to each association of horsemen recognized by the commission as representing the other  breeds of
horses, to be used by that association subject to prior approval of the  commission, in such amounts
and for such of the following purposes as each recognized association deems desirable:
(A) For breeders awards;
(B) For stallion awards;
(C) For education of the  members of the association and other horsemen regarding the breeding
and racing of horses; or
(D) For the promotion and development of horse breeding and racing in Oregon.
[(d) By a licensee of a race meet for greyhounds: ]
[(A) One-half thereof  to augment purses subject to reasonable regulations prescribed by the com-
mission.]
[(B) The other one-half thereof for benefit  and improvement of the breeding, ownership, training
and racing of greyhounds  in Oregon, subject to reasonable regulations prescribed by the commission.
Included, but not by way of limitation, would be payment of purses for maiden graduation or special
schooling races  without wagering, and construction and operation of one or more appropriate public
training facilities within the state. All  such funds shall be retained by the licensee in an account sep-
arate from all other funds, and no disbursements or transfers  shall be made therefrom without prior
approval of the commission. ]
SECTION 16.
 ORS 462.155 is amended to read:
462.155. (1) The Oregon Racing Commission may allow a race meet operator [ that holds a Class
A license ] to conduct mutuel wagering at the licensee’s  race course on horse races previously held
if:
(a) The races were actual events held at race courses during race meets;
(b) The races were subject to mutuel wagering at the time the races were originally held; and
(c) The race meets at which the races were originally held were approved by the commission
or by an equivalent regulatory body in another state.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section allows mutuel wagering on a horse  race displayed as a video
or audio recording,  or another form of recording approved by the commission, but does not authorize
wagering on any animation, computer simulation or other artificial representation of horse racing.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to a race meet operator described in  ORS
462.057 (2). Subsection (1) of this section does not  authorize off-race course wagering or multi-
jurisdictional simulcasting for horse races previously held.
(4) Wagers authorized under subsection (1) of this section  are subject to the provisions of ORS
462.157.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 462.510 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 3020 (HB 3020-A) Page 9
462.510. (1) Any person who attempts to, or does  persuade, procure or cause another person to
wager on an animal participating in a race,  and upon which money is wagered, and who asks or
demands, or accepts compensation  as a reward for information or purported information given in
such case is a tout, and is guilty of touting.
(2) Predictions on the outcome of horse races [ and greyhound races ] may be sold on the
licensee’s premises in accordance with rules promulgated by the Oregon Racing Commission.
SECTION 18.  ORS 462.710 is amended to read:
462.710. (1)  Any race meet licensee may make written application to the Oregon Racing Com-
mission to conduct off-race course mutuel wagering:
(a) On races held at the licensee’s race course; or
(b) On races held at race courses outside this state.
(2) The application shall be in such form, shall contain such information  and shall be submitted
at such time and in such manner  as the commission may require. Information required by the com-
mission may include, but is not limited to, a description of the facilities, equipment  and method of
operation whereby the applicant proposes to conduct off-race course mutuel wagering activities.
(3) The commission shall authorize off-race course mutuel wagering upon such terms and  con-
ditions regarding the time, location and manner of operation as the  commission considers appropri-
ate. The commission may not authorize  more than 20 locations for off-race course mutuel wagering
to be in operation at any one time and shall permit off-race course mutuel wagering only  at an au-
thorized location. The commission may not authorize the conduct  of off-race course mutuel wagering
at any  time or place or in any manner that the commission determines would have substantial ad-
verse impact upon mutuel wagering on races held at a race course in  this state. The commission
may not authorize a race  meet licensee to conduct off-race course mutuel wagering within the
boundaries of any city or county that has adopted an ordinance prohibiting the  conduct of that ac-
tivity within the city or county. The commission may  not authorize a race meet licensee to conduct
off-race course mutuel wagering in any county with a population of less  than 250,000 at a location
that is within 40 miles of any other location where another race meet licensee is conducting  a live
race meet without written consent of the live race meet licensee.
(4) In addition to other  grounds provided in this chapter, the commission may refuse to issue
or renew or may revoke or suspend the license of any race meet licensee, or  any employee thereof,
for failure to comply with ORS 462.700 to 462.740 or commission rules.
(5) If a race meet licensee proposes to conduct off-race course mutuel wagering at  a physical
facility separate from the race course:
(a) Individuals working at the separate facility must obtain a license for such employment  from
the commission if the individuals are performing duties for  which a license would be required if the
duties were performed at  a race course. The fee for any such license shall be the same as the fee
for the license required if the individual were working at a race course.
(b) ORS 462.080, 462.190 and 462.195 apply to the race  meet licensee and to individuals at the
facility in the same manner as if the  mutuel wagering activity were being conducted at a race
course.
(6) In addition to other requirements of ORS 462.700 to 462.740, the commission may authorize
a race meet licensee to conduct off-race course mutuel  wagering on a particular race that is held
at a race course outside this state subject to the following [ conditions] provisions:
(a) The commission may authorize only one race meet  licensee, that is the holder of a license
under ORS 462.062 or 462.067, to conduct off-race course mutuel wagering on the race.
(b) The commission may authorize such off-race course mutuel wagering to be conducted at  the
licensee’s race course and any off-race course wagering site approved by the commission.
[(c) The commission may authorize a race meet licensee to conduct off-race course mutuel wagering
on either horse races or greyhound races, except that: ]
[(A) A horse race meet licensee may conduct off-race course mutuel  wagering on greyhound races
only if there is no active greyhound race meet licensee; and ]
Enrolled House Bill 3020 (HB 3020-A) Page 10
[(B) A greyhound race  meet licensee may conduct off-race course mutuel wagering on horse races
only if there is no active horse race meet licensee. ]
[(d)] (c)  If a licensee applies for authority to  conduct mutuel wagering on horse races held at
race courses outside this state, the  commission may require that the licensee provide such evidence
as the  commission considers appropriate regarding the ability of the licensee to comply with the
Interstate Horseracing Act of 1978, 15 U.S.C. 3001 to 3007, as amended.
SECTION 19. Section 2 of this  2025 Act, the amendments to ORS 462.010, 462.020, 462.030,
462.040, 462.057, 462.067, 462.070, 462.075, 462.110, 462.125, 462.140, 462.155, 462.510, 462.710 and
462.725 by sections 3 to 13 and 15 to 18 of this 2025 Act and the repeal of  ORS 462.135 and
462.279 by section 14 of this 2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2027.
Passed by House March 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3020 (HB 3020-A) Page 11